Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 1
OFFENSES - GENERAL PROVISIONS

1-13-101. District attorney or attorney general to prosecute.

Any person may file an affidavit with the district attorney stating the name of any person who has violated any of the provisions of this code and stating the facts which constitute the alleged offense. Upon the filing of such affidavit, the district attorney shall forthwith investigate, and, if reasonable grounds appear therefor, he shall prosecute the violator.

The attorney general shall have equal power with district attorneys to file and prosecute informations or complaints against any persons for violating any of the provisions of this code.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 428, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-101 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-13-102. Sufficiency of complaint - judicial notice.

Irregularities or defects in the mode of calling, giving notice of, convening, holding, or conducting any general, primary, or congressional vacancy election authorized by law constitute no defense to a prosecution for a violation of this code. When an offense is committed in relation to any general, primary, or congressional vacancy election, an indictment, information, or complaint for such offense is sufficient if it alleges that such election was authorized by law without stating the call or notice of the election, the names of the judges holding such election, or the names of the persons voted for at such election. Judicial notice shall be taken of the holding of any general, primary, or congressional vacancy election.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 428, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-102 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-13-103. Immunity of witness from prosecution.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this code is a competent witness against any other violator and may be compelled to attend and testify at any trial, hearing, proceeding, or investigation in the same manner as other persons; but the testimony so given shall not be used in any prosecution or proceeding, civil or criminal, against the person so testifying, except for perjury in giving such testimony. A person so testifying shall not thereafter be liable to indictment, prosecution, or punishment for the offense with reference to which his testimony was given and may plead or prove the giving of testimony accordingly in bar of such indictment or prosecution.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 429, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-13-103 and 1-30-116 as they existed prior to 1980.

1-13-104. Perjury.

Any person, having taken any oath or made any affirmation required by this code, who swears or affirms willfully, corruptly, and falsely in a matter material to the issue or point in question or who suborns any other person to swear or affirm as aforesaid commits perjury in the second degree as set forth in section 18-8-503, C.R.S., and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 429, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1464, § 5, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1980. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

1-13-105. False certificates by officers.

Any notary public or any officer authorized by law to administer oaths who knowingly makes a false certificate in regard to a matter connected with an election held under the laws of this state upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 429, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1464, § 6, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3122, § 2, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-13-111 and 1-30-125 as they existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

(1) For the power of officers to administer oaths, see § 24-12-103.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

1-13-106. Forgery.

Any person who falsely makes, alters, forges, or counterfeits any ballot before or after it has been cast, or who forges any name of a person as a signer or witness to a petition or nomination paper, or who forges any letter of acceptance, declination, or withdrawal, or who forges the name of a registered elector to a voter's mail-in or mail ballot commits forgery as set forth in section 18-5-102, C.R.S., and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 429, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1435, § 120, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1622, § 5, effective May 31.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1464, § 7, effective October 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1797, § 65, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 747, § 117, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-13-107 and 1-30-130 as they existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

(2) In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-13-107. Violation of duty.

Any public officer, election official, or other person upon whom any duty is imposed by this code who violates, neglects, or fails to perform such duty or is guilty of corrupt conduct in the discharge of the same or any notary public or other officer authorized by law to administer oaths who administers any oath knowing it to be false or who knowingly makes a false certificate in regard to a matter connected with any election provided by law upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 429, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3123, § 3, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-13-111 and 1-30-113 (1) as they existed prior to 1980.

1-13-108. Anonymous statements concerning candidates or issues. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 429, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 297, § 30, effective June 26.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 311, § 25, effective May 9.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1545, § 15, effective July 1.

1-13-109. False or reckless statements relating to candidates or questions submitted to electors - penalties - definitions.

No person shall knowingly make, publish, broadcast, or circulate or cause to be made, published, broadcasted, or circulated in any letter, circular, advertisement, or poster or in any other communication any false statement designed to affect the vote on any issue submitted to the electors at any election or relating to any candidate for election to public office.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection (1)(a) of this section upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

No person shall recklessly make, publish, broadcast, or circulate or cause to be made, published, broadcasted, or circulated in any letter, circular, advertisement, or poster or in any other communication any false statement designed to affect the vote on any issue submitted to the electors at any election or relating to any candidate for election to public office. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for purposes of this subsection (2), a person acts "recklessly" when he or she acts in conscious disregard of the truth or falsity of the statement made, published, broadcasted, or circulated.

Any person who violates any provision of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) commits a class 2 misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

For purposes of this section, "person" means any natural person, partnership, committee, association, corporation, labor organization, political party, or other organization or group of persons, including a group organized under section 527 of the internal revenue code.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 430, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1464, § 8, effective October 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1366, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3123, § 4, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-30-133 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

1-13-110. Wagers with electors.

It is unlawful for any person, including any candidate for election to public office, before or during any election provided by law, to make any bet or wager with an elector, or take a share or interest in, or in any manner become a party to, any such bet or wager, or provide or agree to provide any money to be used by another in making such bet or wager upon any event or contingency arising out of such election. Any person who violates this section upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 430, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3123, § 5, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-13-126 and 1-30-104 as they existed prior to 1980.

1-13-111. Penalties for election offenses.

In all cases in which an offense denominated in this code has no penalty specified, the offender commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 430, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3123, § 6, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-104 (2) as it existed prior to 1980.

1-13-112. Offenses relating to mail ballots.

Any person who, by use of force or other means, unduly influences an elector to vote in any particular manner or to refrain from voting, or who falsely makes, alters, forges, or counterfeits any mail ballot before or after it has been cast, or who destroys, defaces, mutilates, or tampers with such a ballot upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 318, § 2, effective January 1, 1991.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 852, § 83, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3123, § 7, effective March 1, 2022.

1-13-113. Interference with distribution of election material.

During the period beginning forty-five days before and ending four days after any election, any person who prevents, hinders, or interferes with the lawful distribution of any card, pamphlet, circular, poster, handbill, yard sign, or other written material relating to any candidate for election for any office or relating to any issue that is to be submitted to the electors in any election, or any person who removes, defaces, or destroys any lawfully placed billboard, sign, or written material from any premises to which it was delivered upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111. Any person found guilty of removing, defacing, or destroying any billboard, sign, or written material shall pay the cost of replacement. The owner of the premises, an authorized agent of the owner, or any person charged with enforcement of any state law, ordinance, or regulation may remove any billboard, sign, or written material without penalty when placed without permission or authorization of the owner of such premises, or in violation of state law or county or municipal ordinance or regulation, or which is in place at any time other than during the period beginning forty-five days before and ending four days after any election.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1627, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3124, § 8, effective March 1, 2022.

1-13-114. Failure to comply with requirements of secretary of state.

Any person who willfully interferes or willfully refuses to comply with the rules, orders, or acceptable use policy for the statewide voter registration system of the secretary of state or the secretary of state's designated agent in the carrying out of the powers and duties prescribed in section 1-1-107 commits a class 1 misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

Any person who willfully interferes with any person in notifying or obstructs any person from notifying the department of state of a potential violation of subsection (1) of this section when the person reasonably believes that a violation of subsection (1) of this section has occurred or will occur, or retaliates therefore, upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added with relocations, p. 1764, § 48, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3124, § 9, effective March 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-153), ch. 322, p. 2282, § 15, effective June 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-1-107 (3) as it existed prior to 1996.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Colorado Election Security Act") and the legislative declaration in SB 22-153, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 322, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.